Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1432
Franchise; denial; license refused.

If a franchisor enters into or attempts to enter into a franchise, whether
upon termination or refusal to continue another franchise or upon the establishment
of an additional motor vehicle, combination motor vehicle and trailer, motorcycle,
or trailer dealership in a community where the same line-make is then represented,
without first complying with the Motor
Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, no license under the act shall be issued to that franchisee or
proposed franchisee to engage in the business of selling motor vehicles, combination
motor vehicles and trailers, motorcycles, or trailers manufactured or distributed
by that franchisor.

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 32;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 80.